Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.190

Injunction. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

If any person represents himself or herself to be a psychologist, unless the person is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, without possessing a valid license, certificated qualification, or a temporary permit to do so, or if he or she violates any of the provisions of this chapter, any prosecuting attorney, the secretary, or any citizen of the same county may maintain an action in the name of the state to enjoin such person from representing himself or herself as a psychologist. The injunction shall not relieve the person from criminal prosecution, but the remedy by injunction shall be in addition to the liability of such offender to criminal prosecution and to suspension or revocation of his or her license.

[ 1991 c 3 s 203; 1986 c 27 s 8; 1965 c 70 s 24.]

PDFRCW 18.83.190

Injunction. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

If any person represents himself or herself to be a psychologist or licensed psychological associate, unless the person is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, without possessing a valid license, certificated qualification, or a temporary permit to do so, or if he or she violates any of the provisions of this chapter, any prosecuting attorney, the secretary, or any citizen of the same county may maintain an action in the name of the state to enjoin such person from representing himself or herself as a psychologist or licensed psychological associate. The injunction shall not relieve the person from criminal prosecution, but the remedy by injunction shall be in addition to the liability of such offender to criminal prosecution and to suspension or revocation of his or her license.

[ 2024 c 371 s 11; 1991 c 3 s 203; 1986 c 27 s 8; 1965 c 70 s 24.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.